California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
-------------------------------------------

6043.1.

A marketplace facilitator that is registered with the department or required to register with the department under any law that imposes a fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) and that facilitates a retail sale of tangible personal property by a marketplace seller is the retailer or dealer or both for purposes of collecting and remitting any fee imposed on the consumer in regards to that retail sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   (AB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6044.

For purposes of determining the total combined sales of tangible personal property for delivery in this state pursuant to Section 6203:

(a) A marketplace facilitator shall include all sales of tangible personal property for delivery in this state, including sales made on its own behalf and by all related persons and sales facilitated on behalf of marketplace sellers.

(b) A
 marketplace seller shall include all sales of tangible personal property for delivery in this state, including sales made on its own behalf and sales facilitated through any marketplace facilitator’s marketplace.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.   (AB 147)   Effective April 25, 2019.   Section operative October 1, 2019, pursuant to Sec. 6049.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6045.

A marketplace seller shall register with the department under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6051), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201), or any other law that imposes a fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001), as required, for retail sales made on its own behalf and not facilitated through a registered marketplace facilitator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 421, Sec. 5.   (AB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Section operative October 1, 2019, pursuant to Sec. 6049.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Marketplace Facilitator Relief [6046. - 6047.]

6046.

If the marketplace facilitator demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the marketplace facilitator has made a reasonable effort to obtain accurate and complete information from an unrelated marketplace seller about a retail sale and that the failure to remit the correct amount of taxes or fees imposed under this part, or under any other law that imposes a fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001), was due to incorrect or incomplete information provided to the marketplace facilitator by the unrelated marketplace seller, then the marketplace facilitator shall be relieved of liability for the taxes or fees for that retail sale. This section does not apply with regard to a retail sale for which the marketplace facilitator is the retailer
 selling or making the sale of the tangible personal property on its own behalf or if the marketplace facilitator and marketplace seller are related. Where a marketplace facilitator is relieved of liability for the taxes or fees on a retail sale under this section, the marketplace seller is the retailer for that retail sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 421, Sec. 6.   (AB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Section operative October 1, 2019, pursuant to Sec. 6049.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.

(a) A marketplace facilitator shall be relieved of the taxes or fees on retail sales facilitated through its marketplace as provided in subdivision (c) if the marketplace facilitator demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department all of the following:

(1) The retail sales were facilitated for a marketplace seller prior to January 1, 2023, through a marketplace of the marketplace facilitator.

(2) The marketplace facilitator is not the marketplace seller.

(3) The marketplace facilitator and the marketplace seller are not related.

(4) The failure to collect sales and use tax or any other fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) was due to a good faith error other than an error in sourcing the sale pursuant to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)) or any other law that imposes a fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001).

(b) To the extent that a marketplace facilitator is relieved of liability for collection of sales and use tax or any other fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) under this section, the marketplace seller for whom the marketplace facilitator has facilitated the retail sale is also relieved of liability, unless the marketplace seller is the retailer for those retail
 sales pursuant to Section 6046. The department may determine the manner in which a marketplace facilitator or marketplace seller shall claim the liability relief provided in this section.

(c) The liability relief provided under this section shall not exceed the following percentage of the sum of all sales and use tax and any other fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) due on sales facilitated by a marketplace facilitator for marketplace sellers, which sales shall not include sales by the marketplace facilitator or persons related to the marketplace facilitators:

(1) For sales facilitated during the fourth quarter of 2019 or during the 2020 calendar year, 7 percent.

(2) For sales
 facilitated during the 2021 calendar year, 5 percent.

(3) For sales facilitated during the 2022 calendar year, 3 percent.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve any person of liability for collecting but failing to remit to the department sales and use tax or any other fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 421, Sec. 7.   (AB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Section operative October 1, 2019, pursuant to Sec. 6049.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Operative Date [6049.5. - 6049.5.]

6049.5.

(a) This chapter shall become operative on October 1, 2019.

(b) The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.   (AB 147)   Effective April 25, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Sales Tax [6051. - 6172.]



  ARTICLE 1. Imposition of Tax [6051. - 6055.]

6051.

For the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail a tax is hereby imposed upon all retailers at the rate of 212 percent of the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of all tangible personal property sold at retail in this state on or after August 1, 1933, and to and including June 30, 1935, and at the rate of 3 percent thereafter, and at the rate of 212 percent on and after July 1, 1943, and to and
 including June 30, 1949, and at the rate of 3 percent on and after July 1, 1949, and to and including July 31, 1967, and at the rate of 4 percent on and after August 1, 1967, and to and including June 30, 1972, and at the rate of 334 percent on and after July 1, 1972, and to and including June 30, 1973, and at the rate of 434 percent on and after July 1, 1973, and to and including September 30, 1973, and at the rate of 334 percent on and after October 1, 1973, and to and including March 31, 1974, and at the rate of 434 percent thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 117, Sec. 2.   Effective July 16, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6051, for the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail a tax is hereby imposed upon all retailers at the rate of 5 percent of the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of all tangible personal property sold at retail in this state on and after the operative date of this subdivision.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall become operative on December 1, 1989, and shall cease to be operative on January 1, 1991.

(c) The rate prescribed by Section 6051 shall be applicable on and after the first day following the date subdivision (a) ceases to be operative pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 14, Sec. 2.   Effective November 7, 1989.   Note: This section was applicable, and superseded the Section 6051 rate, from Dec. 1, 1989, until Jan. 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.15.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 7101 or any other law, the amount of revenues, net of refunds, collected pursuant to Section 6051 and attributable to a rate of 1.0625 percent shall, subject to subdivision (b), be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund 2011, as established pursuant to Section 30025 of the Government Code, and shall be used exclusively for the public safety
 purposes for which that fund is created.

(b) The amount of revenues derived from any tax or tax increase enacted after July 1, 2011, that is deposited in the Local Revenue Fund 2011 shall be applied to reduce the amount otherwise required to be deposited in that fund pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if the Director of Finance determines that the State Board of Equalization has allocated more revenue to the Local Revenue Fund 2011 than required by subdivisions (a) and (b) for taxable sales that occurred during the period of July 1, 2011, to June 30, 2016, inclusive, the total amount of revenues credited to the Local Revenue Fund 2011 for this period shall be considered to have fulfilled the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b), and no allocation adjustment for this period shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 25, Sec. 5.   (SB 90)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.2.

(a) In addition to the taxes imposed by Section 6051 and any other provision of this part, for the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail, a tax is hereby imposed upon all retailers at the rate of 12 percent of the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of all tangible
 personal property sold at retail in this state on and after July 15, 1991.

(b) All revenues received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, as established pursuant to Section 17600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) This section shall cease to be operative on the first day of the first month of the calendar quarter following notification to the board by the Department of Finance of a final judicial determination by the California Supreme Court or any California court of appeal that the revenues collected pursuant to this section and Section 6201.2 that are deposited in the Local Revenue Fund are either of the following:

(1) “General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB of the California
 Constitution,” as used in subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(2) “Allocated local proceeds of taxes,” as used in subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if the Director of Finance determines that the State Board of Equalization has allocated more revenue to the Local Revenue Fund than required by subdivisions (a) and (b) for taxable sales that occurred during the period of July 1, 2011, to June 30, 2016, inclusive, the total amount of revenues credited to the Local Revenue Fund for this period shall be considered to have fulfilled the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b), and no allocation adjustment for this period shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 25, Sec. 6.   (SB 90)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Section conditionally inoperative by its own provisions and by Stats. 1991, Ch. 91, Sec. 40, as amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.3.

In addition to the taxes imposed by Sections 6051, 6051.2, 6051.5, and any other provision of this part, for the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail, a tax is hereby imposed upon all retailers at the rate of
 14 percent of the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of all tangible personal property sold at retail in this state on and after July 15, 1991, and during any period in which this section is operative pursuant to Section 6051.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 117, Sec. 3.   Effective July 16, 1991.   Tax operative as provided in Section 6051.4.   Tax conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Sections 6051.4 and 6051.45.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.4.

(a) Section 6051.3 shall be operative with respect to the sale of all tangible personal property sold at retail in this state on or after July 15, 1991, but shall cease to be
 operative during any period described in subdivision (c) or (d). 

(b) On or before November 1, 1993, and on or before every November 1 thereafter, the Director of Finance shall determine and certify to the Governor, the Legislature, and the board both of the following: 

(1) Whether the amount in the Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties, as established pursuant to Section 16418 of the Government Code, as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year exceeded 4 percent of General Fund revenues for that prior fiscal year. 

(2) Whether the estimated amount in the Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties as of June 30 of the current fiscal year (without inclusion of any revenue derived pursuant to Section 6051.3 on and after January 1 of the current fiscal year) exceeds 4 percent of General Fund revenues for the current fiscal
 year.

(c) Section 6051.3 shall cease to be operative on and after January 1, 1994, if on or before November 1, 1993, the Director of Finance certifies pursuant to subdivision (b) that both amounts certified pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of that subdivision exceed 4 percent of General Fund revenues for the respective fiscal year for which each amount is determined and certified. 

(d) Section 6051.3 shall cease to be operative on and after January 1 following any November 1 in which Section 6051.3 is operative and the Director of Finance certifies pursuant to subdivision (b) that both amounts certified pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of that subdivision exceed 4 percent of General Fund revenues for the respective fiscal year for which each amount is determined and certified.

(e) Section 6051.3 shall become
 operative on and after January 1 following any November 1 in which Section 6051.3 is inoperative and the Director of Finance certifies pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) that the estimated amount does not exceed 4 percent of the General Fund revenues as of June 30 of the current fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 117, Sec. 4.   Effective July 16, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.45.

Notwithstanding 6051.4 or any other provision of law, the state sales tax rate in Section 6051.3 shall not be operative in any calendar year beginning on or after January 1,
 2002, if the Director of Finance determines both of the following:

(a) The General Fund reserve is 3 percent of revenues excluding the revenues derived from the 14 cent sales and use tax rate.

(b) Actual General Fund revenues for the period May 1 through September 30 equal or exceed the May Revision forecast, prior to the November 1 determination.

The Director of Finance shall make the determination on or before November 1 of each year.

The 14 cent reduction shall be operative for each calendar year commencing on the next January 1 after the determination is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.   Effective August 7, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.5.

(a) In addition to the taxes imposed by Section 6051 and any other provision of this part, for the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail a tax is hereby imposed upon all retailers at the rate of one-quarter of 1 percent of
 the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of all tangible personal property sold at retail in this state.

(b) All revenues, net of refunds, received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Fiscal Recovery Fund, as established pursuant to Section 99008 of the Government Code.

(c) Revenues received pursuant to this section accruing to the Fiscal Recovery Fund shall not be considered to be “State General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” within the meaning of either Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution or Section 41202 of the Education Code.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2004, and shall cease to be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than
 90 days following a notification to the board by the Director of Finance pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 99006 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 4.12.   Effective December 12, 2003.   Repealing and adding actions operative March 3, 2004, pursuant to Sec. 8 of Ch. 2.   Section operative July 1, 2004, by its own provisions.   Became inoperative on January 1, 2016, pursuant to its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.6.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by Section 6051.5 the gross receipts derived from the sale of tangible personal property, other than fuel or petroleum products, to operators of aircraft to be used or consumed principally outside the county in which the sale is made and directly and exclusively in the use of the aircraft as common carriers of persons or property under the authority of the laws of this state, the United States, or any foreign government.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 13, Sec. 4.   Effective October 28, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.8.

(a) Except as provided by Section 6357.3, in addition to the taxes imposed by this part, for the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail a tax is hereby imposed upon all retailers at the rate of 1.75 percent of the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of all diesel fuel, as defined in Section 60022.

(b) Except
 as provided by Section 6357.3, in addition to the taxes imposed by this part and by subdivision (a), commencing November 1, 2017, for the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail a tax is hereby imposed upon all retailers at the rate of 4 percent of the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of all diesel fuel, as defined in Section 60022, sold at retail in this state.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 7102, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), all of the revenues, less refunds, collected pursuant to this section shall be estimated by the State Board of Equalization, with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, and transferred quarterly to the Public Transportation Account in the State Transportation Fund for allocation under the State Transit Assistance Program pursuant to Section 99312.1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) The revenues, less refunds, attributable to a rate of 0.5 percent of the 4-percent increase in the rate pursuant to subdivision (b), amounting to one-eighth of revenues from the increase in the rate under that subdivision, shall be estimated by the State Board of Equalization, with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, and transferred quarterly to the Public Transportation Account in the State Transportation Fund for allocation by the Transportation Agency to intercity rail and commuter rail purposes pursuant to Section 99312.3 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 23.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6052.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6010.5, and except as provided in subdivision (c), a retailer is relieved from liability to pay sales tax on the sale or purchase of a digital product that is transferred electronically or accessed remotely if the following applies, unless the purchaser is an insurer, as defined in Section 28 of Article XIII of the California Constitution:

(1) (A) The gross receipts from the sale of digital products by a retailer to a purchaser that are transferred electronically or accessed remotely exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the aggregate in the current calendar year, or, beginning January 1, 2028, in the current or the preceding calendar year.

(B) The purchaser shall become liable for the use tax pursuant to subdivision (b) on the transaction that caused the retailer to exceed the threshold specified in subparagraph (A) and any adjustments made pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) (A) On or before October 1, 2031, and every five years thereafter, the department shall multiply the amount specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) by the percentage increase in the California Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers between October 1, 2026, and the date of the calculation required by this subparagraph, and the result shall be rounded to the nearest one million dollars ($1,000,000) and shall be the applicable amount for the succeeding calendar year.

(B) The applicable amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be operative beginning
 January 1 of the succeeding calendar year, and four years thereafter, as an adjustment of the amount specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(b) If a retailer is relieved from liability to pay sales tax pursuant to subdivision (a), the purchaser is liable for the use tax and shall self-assess and pay directly to the department taxes due under this part, Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and, if otherwise applicable, Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) and Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7280) on the transaction that caused the retailer to exceed the threshold specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and any adjustments made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) If the department determines that it is necessary for the efficient administration of this part, the department may waive the requirement
 for the purchaser to self-assess and pay taxes due directly to the department under subdivision (b), and the retailer shall be liable to pay the sales tax if the purchaser submits to the department a request for waiver in a form and manner prescribed by the department that includes all the places of business where the applicant expects to be a place of first use for purchases of digital products subject to subdivision (a).

(2) A purchaser that submits a request for waiver to the department under paragraph (1) shall also submit to the retailer all places of business where the purchaser expects to be a place of first use, which shall be considered the place of sale for purposes of the sales tax.

(d) A purchaser that is required to pay use taxes to the department under subdivision (b) shall obtain a use tax direct payment permit pursuant to the procedures provided in Section
 7051.3.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 12.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6054.

(a) A retailer is relieved from liability to pay sales tax or collect use tax on the sale or purchase of a digital product transferred electronically or accessed remotely if the place of the sale or purchase of the digital product was deemed to be outside of this state pursuant to Section 6010.5, and the retailer demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the retailer made a reasonable effort to obtain accurate and complete address information from the purchaser.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 13.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6055.

(a) (1) A retailer is relieved from liability for sales tax that became due and payable, insofar as the measure of the tax is represented by accounts that have been found to be worthless and charged off for income tax purposes by the retailer or, if the retailer is not required to file income tax returns, charged off in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A retailer that has previously paid the tax may, under rules and regulations prescribed by the department, take as a deduction the amount found worthless and charged off by the retailer. If these accounts are thereafter in whole or in part collected by the retailer, the amount collected shall be included in the first return filed after the collection and the tax shall be paid with the return.

(2) (A) Before January 1, 2025, for purposes of this subdivision, the term “retailer” shall include any entity affiliated with the retailer under Section 1504 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(B) An entity that is a retailer under this paragraph shall not be entitled to a deduction under paragraph (1) on or after January 1, 2025.

(b) (1) In the case of accounts held by a lender, a retailer or lender that makes a proper election under paragraph (4) shall be entitled to a deduction or refund of the tax that the retailer has previously reported and paid if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) A deduction was not previously claimed or allowed on any portion of the accounts.

(B) The accounts have been found worthless and written off by the lender in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (a) before January 1, 2025.

(C) The contract between the retailer and the lender contains an irrevocable relinquishment of all rights to the account from the retailer to the lender.

(D) The retailer remitted the tax on or after January 1, 2000.

(E) The party electing to claim the deduction or refund under paragraph (4) files a claim in a manner prescribed by the department.

(2) If the retailer or the lender thereafter collects in whole or in part any accounts, one of the following shall apply:

(A) If the retailer is entitled to the deduction or refund under the election specified in paragraph (4), the retailer shall include the amount collected in its first return filed after the collection and pay tax on that amount with the return.

(B) If the lender is entitled to the deduction or refund under the election specified in paragraph (4), the lender shall pay the tax to the department in accordance with Section 6451.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “lender” means any of the following:

(A) Any person that holds a retail account which that person purchased directly from a retailer who reported the tax.

(B) Any person that holds a retail account pursuant to that person’s contract directly with the retailer that reported the tax.

(C) Any person that is either an affiliated entity, under Section 1504 of Title 26 of the United States Code, of a person described in subparagraph (A) or (B), or an assignee of a person described in subparagraph (A) or
 (B).

(4) For purposes of this section, a “proper election” shall be established when the retailer that reported the tax and the lender prepare and retain an election form, signed by both parties, designating which party is entitled to claim the deduction or refund. This election may not be amended or revoked unless a new election, signed by both parties, is prepared and retained by the retailer and the lender.

(c) This section shall remain operative until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 9.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 10 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

6055.

(a) A retailer is relieved from liability for sales tax that became due and payable, insofar as the measure of the tax is represented by accounts that have been found to be worthless and charged off for income tax purposes by the retailer or, if the retailer is not required to file income tax returns, charged off in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A retailer that has previously paid the tax may, under rules and regulations prescribed by the department, take as a deduction the amount found worthless and charged off by the retailer. If these accounts are thereafter in whole or in part collected by the retailer, the amount collected shall be included in the first return filed after the collection and the tax shall be paid with the return.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 10.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Permits [6066. - 6077.]

6066.

(a) Every person desiring to engage in or conduct business as a seller within this state shall file with the board an application for a permit for each place of business. Every application for a permit shall be made upon a form prescribed by the board and shall set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or intends to transact business, the location of his place or places of business, and such other information as the board may require. An application for a permit shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may
 be prescribed by the board. The application shall state that the applicant will actively engage in or conduct business as a seller of tangible personal property.

(b) An application filed pursuant to this section may be filed using electronic media as prescribed by the board.

(c) Electronic media includes, but is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disk, facsimile machine, or telephone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 1.4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6066.3.

(a) A city, county, or city and county may collect information from persons desiring to engage in business in that jurisdiction for the purposes of selling tangible personal property under this part and shall transmit that information to the board. The information shall be provided to the board in a format to be determined by the board after consulting with the League of California Cities and the California State Association of Counties.

(b) The information submitted to
 the board under subdivision (a) shall serve as all of the following:

(1) The preliminary application for a seller’s permit.

(2) Notification to the board by the city, county, or city and county of a person desiring to engage in the business of selling of tangible personal property in that jurisdiction.

(3) Notice to the board for purposes of redistribution under Section 7209.

(c) The board shall issue a determination regarding issuance of a seller’s permit and receipt of notification for purposes of paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b). The board shall provide a copy of that determination and receipt of notification to the city, county, or city and county from which the board has received information under subdivision (a). The board shall make its
 determination as follows:

(1) For persons for whom a determination can be made based on the information submitted, the determination shall be issued within 30 days of receipt of the information.

(2) For persons for whom additional information is required before a determination can be made, the determination shall be issued within 120 days of receipt of the information.

(d) The board shall, after consulting with the League of California Cities and the California State Association of Counties, adopt standardized data addressing and naming conventions that are compatible with local jurisdiction conventions for new registrants and, to the extent possible, for current accounts.

(e) A city, county, or city and county may not charge applicants a fee for
 collecting and transmitting information pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 471, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6066.4.

A city, county, or city and county may require each person desiring to engage in business in that jurisdiction for the purposes of selling tangible personal property to provide his or her seller’s permit account number, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 471, Sec. 21.1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6066.5.

At the time the board provides the applicant with an application form, the applicant shall be provided with a written notice in a form prescribed by the board outlining the provisions of Sections 6072 and 6094.5 and the penalties that will accrue to the applicant should the permit be used in a manner which is prohibited by those sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 91, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6067.

After compliance with Sections 6066 and 6701 by the applicant, and after giving the applicant the notice required by Section 6066.5, the board shall grant and issue to each applicant a separate permit for each place of business within the state. A permit is not assignable and is valid only for the person in whose name it is issued and for the transaction of business at the place designated therein. It shall at all times be conspicuously displayed at the place for which issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 614.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6068.

Upon such notification of a change of address as may be required by the board, a permit may be reissued for the new address of a business place of a permitholder without the filing of a new application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6069.

A seller whose permit has been previously suspended or revoked shall pay the board a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for the renewal or issuance of a permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 545, Sec. 1.   (AB 1547)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6070.

Whenever any person fails to comply with any provision of this part relating to the sales tax or any rule or regulation of the board relating to the sales tax prescribed and adopted under this part, the board upon hearing, after giving the person 10 days’ notice in writing specifying the time and place of hearing and requiring him to show cause why his permit or permits should not be revoked, may revoke or suspend any one or more of the permits held by the person. The board shall give to the person written notice of the suspension or revocation of any of his permits. The notices herein required may be served personally or by mail in the manner prescribed for service of
 notice of a deficiency determination. The board shall not issue a new permit after the revocation of a permit unless it is satisfied that the former holder of the permit will comply with the provisions of this part relating to the sales tax and the regulations of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, Ch. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6070.5.

(a) The board may refuse to issue a permit to any person submitting an application for a permit as required in Section 6066 if the person desiring to engage in or conduct business as a seller within this state has an outstanding final liability with the board for any amount due under this part.

(b) In addition to the provisions of subdivision (a), the board may also refuse to issue a permit if the
 person desiring to engage in or conduct business as a seller within this state is not a natural person or individual and any person controlling the person desiring to engage in or conduct business as a seller within this state has an outstanding final liability with the board as provided in subdivision (a). For the purposes of this section, “controlling” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22971 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, a liability will not be deemed to be outstanding if the person has entered into an installment payment agreement pursuant to Section 6832 for any liability and is in full compliance with the terms of the installment payment agreement.

(d) If the person submitting an application for a seller’s permit has entered into an installment payment agreement as provided in subdivision (c) and fails to comply with the
 terms of the installment payment agreement, the board may seek revocation of the seller’s permit obtained by the person pursuant to this section.

(e) (1) Whenever any person desiring to engage in or conduct business as a seller within this state is denied a permit pursuant to this section, the board shall give to the person written notice of the denial. The notice of the denial may be served personally, by mail, or by other means deemed appropriate by the board. If served by mail, the notice shall be placed in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the person at the address as it appears in the records of the board. The giving of notice shall be deemed complete at the time of deposit of the notice at the United States Postal Service, or a mailbox, subpost office, substation or mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service, without extension of time for any
 reason. In lieu of mailing, a notice may be served personally by delivering to the person to be served and service shall be deemed complete at the time of the delivery. Delivery of notice by other means deemed appropriate by the board may include, but is not limited to, electronic transmission. Personal service or delivery by other means deemed appropriate by the board to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person listed on the application as an officer.

(2) Any person who is denied a seller’s permit pursuant to this section may request reconsideration of the board’s denial of the permit. This request shall be submitted in writing within 30 days of the date of the notice of denial. Timely submission of a written request for reconsideration shall afford the person a hearing in a manner that is consistent with a hearing provided for by Section 6070. If a request for reconsideration is not filed within the 30-day period, the
 denial becomes final at the end of the 30-day period.

(f) The board shall consider offers in compromise when determining whether to issue a seller’s permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 734, Sec. 2.   (AB 1307)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6071.

A person who engages in business as a seller in this state without a permit or permits or after a permit has been suspended or revoked, and each officer of any corporation which so engages in business, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 7153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1361, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

6071.1.
